Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Pesticide Dealers

43-8-201. Pesticide dealers — License required.

No person shall sell or offer for sale within this state pesticides classified by the commissioner as being for restricted use, unless such person is the holder of a valid pesticide dealer license. A separate license shall be obtained for each location or outlet from which business is conducted.

No person shall sell or offer for sale within this state any pesticide classified by the commissioner as being for restricted use unless the person to whom the sale is made holds a valid certificate or license issued by the department of agriculture, as required by § 62-21-115. The pesticide dealer shall require that each purchaser show evidence of such certificate or license prior to finalizing the sale.

Pesticide dealer license fee shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Acts 1975, ch. 239, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-706; Acts 1980, ch. 539, § 5; 2004, ch. 464, § 3; 2015, ch. 485, § 5.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

Cross-References. Distribution of adulterated fertilizer products, § 43-11-124.

Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. § 135 et seq.

Hazardous chemical right to know law, title 50, ch. 3, part 20.

Hazardous substances, title 68, ch. 131.

Hazardous waste management, title 68, ch. 212.

Pest control operators, regulation and licensing, title 62, ch. 21.

43-8-202. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-8-202 (Acts 1975, ch. 239, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-706; Acts 1980, ch. 539, § 5), concerning applications for licenses, fees and renewals, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 960, § 8.

43-8-203. Qualifications for pesticide dealer license.

Each applicant for an original license must demonstrate, upon written, or written and oral, examination to be prescribed by the commissioner, the applicant's knowledge of pesticides, their usefulness and their hazards, the applicant's competence as a pesticide dealer and the applicant's knowledge of the laws and regulations governing the use and sale of pesticides.

Acts 1975, ch. 239, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-706; Acts 1980, ch. 539, § 5.

43-8-204. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-8-204 (Acts 1975, chapter 239, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-706), concerning the regulations promulgated by the commissioner, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 539, §§ 5, 6.

43-8-205. Pesticide dealer's employees — List of names furnished to commissioner — Dealer's responsibility for employees' actions.

Every licensed pesticide dealer shall submit to the commissioner with each application for an original or renewal license, and at such other times as the commissioner may prescribe, the names of all persons employed by the pesticide dealer who sell or solicit the sale of restricted use pesticides.

Each pesticide dealer shall be responsible for the action of every person who acts as the dealer's employee or agent in the solicitation or sale of pesticides, and in all claims and recommendations for use or application of pesticides; however, it is not the intent of this section to license a pesticide applicator who sells pesticides as an integral part of such applicator's services when such applicator has complied with existing applicators' laws.

Acts 1975, ch. 239, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-706; Acts 1980, ch. 539, § 5.

43-8-206. Records of restricted use pesticides.

Every licensed pesticide dealer shall maintain records necessary to identify all purchasers of restricted use pesticides.

Each pesticide dealer's records shall include the name of the purchaser, the purchaser's certification number, and the name and the amount of the pesticide purchased.

Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 3.